New York, session 2025-2026, A1238.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 212 of the civil practice law and rules is amended 2 by adding a new subdivision (f) to read as follows: 3 (f) Overcharge based on mistake or billing error. An action to recover 4 the amount of an overcharge based upon a mistake or billing error made 5 by an electric, gas, or telephone corporation must be commenced within 6 ten years. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to all 8 causes of action occurring on or after such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02977-01-5